Massachusetts, session 194th, H225.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 69 of Chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
paragraphs (a) and (b) and replaced with the following:
(a) There shall be a permanent commission on the status of grandparents raising
grandchildren which shall consist of 21 persons as follows: 3 persons appointed by the secretary
of elder affairs, 1 of whom shall be from the secretary's office; 3 persons appointed by the
commissioner of children and families, 1 of whom who shall be from the department, 2 of whom
shall be grandparents or kinship caregivers with current or past experience raising minor
children; 1 person appointed by the commissioner of the department of transitional assistance; 2
persons appointed by the governor; 2 persons appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, 1 of whom shall be a member of the house; 1 person appointed by the house
minority leader; 2 persons appointed by the president of the senate, 1 of whom shall be a member
of the senate; 1 person appointed by the senate minority leader; 1 person appointed by the
of 3

attorney general; 1 person appointed by the chief justice of the probate and family court who
shall have a demonstrated commitment to the rearing of grandchildren by grandparents; 1 person
to be appointed by the chief justice of the juvenile court who shall have a demonstrated
commitment to the rearing of grandchildren by grandparents; and 3 persons who shall be
grandparents or kinship caregivers with current or past experience raising minor children, who
shall be nominated for appointment by the officers of the commission and appointed by a
majority vote of the commissioners present and voting. Members of the commission shall be
residents of the commonwealth who have demonstrated a commitment to the rearing of
grandchildren by grandparents.
(b) Members shall serve terms of 4 years and until their successors are appointed.
Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled by the original appointing
authority for the balance of the unexpired term. All appointments shall be made in consultation
with the Commission on the Status of Grandparents Raising Grandchildren. Nominations for
members shall be solicited by the appointing authorities between August 1 and September 16 of
each year through an open application process.
SECTION 2. Section 69 of Chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
paragraph (e) and replaced with the following:
(e) The commission shall be a resource to the commonwealth on issues affecting
grandparents raising grandchildren in the commonwealth. In furtherance of that responsibility,
the commission shall: (i) foster unity among grandparents raising grandchildren communities
and organizations in the commonwealth by promoting cooperation and sharing of information
and encouraging collaboration and joint activities; (ii) serve as a liaison between government and
of 3

private interest groups with regard to matters of unique interest and concern to grandparents
raising grandchildren in the commonwealth; (iii) assess programs, regulations, and practices in
all state agencies as they affect grandparents raising grandchildren, as the commission deems
necessary and appropriate, and advocate for changes the commission deems necessary and
appropriate; (iv) advise executive and legislative bodies of the potential effect of proposed
legislation on grandparents raising grandchildren, as the commission deems necessary and
appropriate, and advocate for changes the commission deems necessary and appropriate; (v)
investigate the merits of the establishment of a state agency dedicated to grandparents issues and
determine how such agency would be set up; and (vi) identify issues that are faced by relatives,
other than parents, who are raising children
of 3